Arkansas, session 2025, HB1036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Under the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 19, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 6(a)(2)(G),
concerning statements informing voter registration applicants, is amended to
read as follows:
(G) Inform the applicant that if the voter registration
application is being collected by a third-party voter registration
organization, the third-party voter registration organization may be unable
to deliver the application to the permanent registrar in the county in which
the applicant resides before the thirty-day pre-election voter registration
deadline under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 9(b)(1) to vote in the
next election and that the applicant may elect to deliver the application in
*SSS016*
01-16-2025 16:17:50 SSS016

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1036
person or by mail; and

SECTION 2. Under the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 19, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 8(a), concerning
the processing of voter registration applications, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) The Office of Driver Services, State Revenue Offices state
revenue offices, public assistance agencies, disabilities agencies, and other
voter registration agencies shall transmit all completed voter registration
applications to the Secretary of State in sufficient time to allow the
Secretary of State to transmit the applications to the appropriate permanent
registrar no later than ten (10) days after the date of acceptance by the
assisting agency. When applications are accepted within five (5) days before
the last day of for an election under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, §
9(b)(1), they must be transmitted no later than five (5) days after the date
of acceptance at the assisting agency.
(2) The Secretary of State shall transmit all mail voter
registration applications to the appropriate permanent registrar no later
than ten (10) days after the date of receipt. When applications are received
within five (5) days before the last day of pre-election registration for an
election under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 9(b)(1), they must be
transmitted no later than five (5) days after date of receipt. If forms are
received by the wrong election office, they shall be forwarded to the
appropriate permanent registrar not later than the fifth day after receipt.

SECTION 3. Under the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 19, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 9(b), concerning
the voter registration deadline, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this
section, Registration registration shall be in progress at all times except
during the thirty-day period immediately prior to any election scheduled
within the county, during which period registration of voters shall cease for
that election, but registration during such period shall be effective for
subsequent elections.
(2) Registration shall be permitted:
(A) During early voting for a person appearing in person
01-16-2025 16:17:50 SSS016

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1036
at an early voting location; and
(B) On election day for a person appearing in person at a
polling site or a vote center established in his or her county of residence.

SECTION 4. Under the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 19, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 9(c)(2),
concerning voter registration submitted to the permanent registrar, is
amended to read as follows:
(2) Any person who assists applicants with a voter registration
application as part of a voter registration drive or who, in furtherance of a
voter registration drive, gathers or possesses completed applications for
submission to the permanent registrar or Secretary of State shall deliver all
applications in his or her possession to the permanent registrar or Secretary
of State within twenty-one (21) days of the date on the voter registration
application and, in any event, no later than the deadline for pre-election
voter registration for the next election under Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 9(b)(1).

SECTION 5. Under the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 19, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 10(b)(2),
concerning updating voter registration, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) If the updated registration information is actually
received in the office of the county clerk of the voter's new county not
later than four (4) days before a scheduled election, the voter shall have
the right to vote in the scheduled election in the precinct into which the
voter just moved in the new county.
(B) If the updated registration information is not
actually received by the fourth day before a scheduled election, the voter
shall not be eligible to vote in the scheduled election may update his or his
voter registration in accordance with subsection (g) of this section.

SECTION 6. Under the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 19, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 10(c), concerning
the deadline to change legal residence on voter registration, is amended to
read as follows:
(c) If the change of legal residence is made pursuant to subsection
01-16-2025 16:17:50 SSS016

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1036
(a) or subdivision (d)(1) of this section following the deadline for pre-
election voter registration during the thirty-day administrative cut-off
period under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 9(b)(1) immediately prior
to any election scheduled within the county, the registered voter shall
retain his or her right to vote in the scheduled election in the precinct to
which he or she just moved.

SECTION 7. Under the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 19, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 10, concerning
transfer and change of status for voter registration, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(g) A person appearing in person on election day or during early
voting at an open polling site, a vote center, or an early voting location
established in his or her county of residence may update his or her voter
registration on the same day as his or her appearance in accordance with § 7-
5-113.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 7-1-113(c)(3), concerning duties of an
election official before a person is permitted to cast a vote at a vote
center, is amended to read as follows:
(3) If the voter's name or address is not the same as that in
the county voter registration record files, request that the voter complete
an updated voter registration application form in accordance with § 7-5-113;
and

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code Title 7, Chapter 5, is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
7-5-113. Voter registration on election day or during early voting.
(a) A person appearing in person on election day or during early
voting at an open polling site, a vote center, or an early voting location
established in his or her county of residence is eligible to register to vote
or update registration on the same day as his or her appearance.
(b) To register or update registration and vote under subsection (a)
of this section:
(1) The person shall:
(A) Register in the manner set forth by Arkansas
01-16-2025 16:17:50 SSS016

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1036
Constitution, Amendment 51; or
(B) Update his or her registration by completing an
updated voter registration application;
(2) The person shall sign a written eligibility affirmation
under penalty of perjury in the presence of a poll worker that he or she is
eligible to vote and has not already voted in the election in any county in
the state;
(3) The poll worker shall verify that the person has not already
voted in the election in any county in the state; and
(4) The poll worker shall update the voter registration records
in a manner immediately evident to every open polling site, vote center, and
early voting location in every county in the state to indicate that the
person has voted in the election.
(c)(1) If the poll worker is unable to complete the required duties in
subdivisions (b)(3) or (b)(4) of this section, the voter may cast a
provisional ballot in accordance with the procedures in § 7-5-308.
(2) Unless enjoined by a court with jurisdiction, a provisional
ballot under this subsection shall be counted if:
(A) The voter returns to the county board of election
commissioners or the county clerk by 12:00 noon on the Monday following the
election and presents documentation that allows the county board of election
commissioners or the county clerk to verify the requirements in subdivisions
(b)(3) and (b)(4) of this section; and
(B) The county board of election commissioners does not
determine that the provisional ballot is invalid and should not be counted
based on other grounds.
(d) Poll workers shall maintain an additional list in the same format
as the precinct voter registration list for all persons who register to vote
or update voter registration under this section which shall be considered
part of the precinct voter registration list.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 7-5-201(a), concerning voter
qualifications, is amended to read as follows:
(a) To be qualified to vote, a person shall have registered at least
thirty (30) calendar days immediately prior to the election and in the manner
set forth by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51.
01-16-2025 16:17:50 SSS016

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1036

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 7-5-305(a)(5) and (6), concerning poll
worker duties before a person is permitted to vote, is amended to read as
follows:
(5)(A) If the voter's address is not the same as that on the
precinct voter registration list, verify with the county clerk that the
address is within the precinct.
(B) If the address is within the precinct, request the
voter to complete a voter registration application form for the purpose of
updating county voter registration record files in accordance with § 7-5-113.
(C) If the address is not within the precinct:
(i) Verify with the county clerk's office the proper
precinct; and
(ii) Instruct the voter to go to the polling site
serving that precinct in order for his or her vote to be counted;
(6) If the voter's name is not the same as that on the precinct
voter registration list, request the voter to complete a voter registration
application form for purposes of updating county voter registration record
files in accordance with § 7-5-113;

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 7-5-306(a), concerning procedure when a
voter's name is not on the precinct voter registration list, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) If the a voter's name is not on the precinct voter registration
list, the poll worker shall permit the voter to vote only under the following
conditions voter shall not vote until the voter registers or updates his or
her registration in accordance with § 7-5-113.:
(1) The voter identifies himself or herself by stating his or
her name and date of birth and is verified by the county clerk as a
registered voter within the county and, if the county is divided into more
than one (1) congressional district, within the same congressional district;
(2) The voter gives and affirms his or her current residence and
the poll worker verifies with the county clerk that the voter's residence is
within the precinct;
(3) The voter completes an updated voter registration
application form; and
01-16-2025 16:17:50 SSS016

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1036
(4) The voter signs the precinct voter registration list.

/s/A. Collins

































01-16-2025 16:17:50 SSS016